South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S414.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Financial Institutions, relating to Declaration of Dividends by State-chartered Credit Unions, designated as Regulation Document Number 5286, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Financial Institutions (BOFI) proposes to amend Regulation 15-50 to incorporate languages that clarifies the meaning of Section 34-26-710 regarding the declaring and paying of dividends by a credit union. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. The Proposed Regulation was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----